District of Columbia statutes.
47-1075

Far Southeast Community Organization; lots 73, 74, and 75 in square 5753.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “inclusive housing” means a housing development in which all units are rented to occupying households with not more than 80% of area median income (adjusted for household size) for a rent not exceeding 30% of household income as such amounts are determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(b)

The real property located at lots 73, 74, and 75, square 5753, shall be exempt from taxation so long as the property is owned by Far Southeast Community Organization and the property is used for inclusive housing. If the real property is sold or is not used for the purpose of inclusive housing, the exemption shall terminate as of the beginning of the year in which the sale or non-compliant use occurred; provided, that if the real property ceases to be used for the purpose of inclusive housing less than 15 years after the effective date of this section [March 14, 2007]:

(1)

The exemption shall terminate as of the effective date of this section [March 14, 2007] and the amount of taxes exempted under this section shall become due; and

(2)

This subsection shall constitute a lien against the property to secure the repayment of such amount, plus interest accruing thereon.

History

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 1072(b), 53 DCR 6899
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 133, 170(c), 254(b), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.

Temporary Legislation

Section 2 of D.C. Law 16-157, as amended by section 13(b) of D.C. Law 16-294, added § 47-1074 to read as follows:
“§ 47-1074. Far Southeast Community Organization; lots 73, 74, and 75, square 5753.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term ”inclusive housing“ means a housing development in which units are rented to occupying households with not more than 80% of area median income (adjusted for household size) for a rent not exceeding 30% of household income as such amounts are determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
“(b) The real property located at lots 73, 74, and 75, square 5753, shall be exempt from taxation so long as the property is owned by Far Southeast Community Organization and the property is used for inclusive housing. If the real property is sold or is not used for the purpose of inclusive housing, the exemption shall terminate as of the beginning of the year in which the sale or non-compliant use occurred.”
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 16-157 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Far Southeast Community Organization Tax Exemption and Forgiveness for Accrued Taxes Exemption and Relief Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-372, May 19, 2006, 53 DCR 4384).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Far Southeast Community Organization Tax Exemption and Forgiveness for Accrued Taxes Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-449, July 21, 2006, 53 DCR 6491).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1071 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle G of title I of the act may be cited as the “Far Southeast Community Organization Tax Exemption and Forgiveness for Accrued Taxes Act of 2006”.